test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h18_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: týggi
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: týggi
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [týggi, týggj]
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: týggis
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [týggi, týggir]
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [týggi, týggir]
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: týggjum
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: týggja
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: týggið
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: týggið
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: týgginum
    týggi+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: týggisins
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: týggini
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: týggini
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: týggjunum
    týggi+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: týggjanna
